Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201718-2713
Election; procedures.

Before adopting an economic development program, a city shall submit the question of its adoption to the registered voters at an election. The governing body of the city shall order the submission of the question by filing a certified copy of the resolution proposing the economic development program with the election commissioner or county clerk not later than fifty days prior to a special election or a municipal primary or general election which is not held at the statewide primary or general election or not later than March 1 prior to a statewide primary election or September 1 prior to a statewide general election. The question on the ballot shall briefly set out the terms, conditions, and goals of the proposed economic development program, including the length of time during which the program will be in existence, the year or years within which the funds from local sources of revenue are to be collected, the source or sources from which the funds are to be collected, the total amount to be collected for the program from local sources of revenue, and whether the city proposes to issue bonds pursuant to the Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act to provide funds to carry out the economic development program. The ballot question shall also specify whether additional funds from other noncity sources will be sought beyond those derived from local sources of revenue. In addition to all other information, if the funds are to be derived from the city's property tax, the ballot question shall state the present annual cost of the economic development program per ten thousand dollars of assessed valuation based upon the most recent valuation of the city certified to the Property Tax Administrator pursuant to section 77-1613.01. The ballot question shall state: "Shall the city of (name of the city) establish an economic development program as described here by appropriating annually from local sources of revenue $...... for ....... years?". If the only city revenue source for the proposed economic development program is a local option sales tax that has not yet been approved at an election, the ballot question specifications in this section may be repeated in the sales tax ballot question.

If a majority of those voting on the issue vote in favor of the question, the governing body may implement the proposed economic development program upon the terms set out in the resolution. If a majority of those voting on the economic development program vote in favor of the question when the only city revenue source is a proposed sales tax and a majority of those voting on the local option sales tax vote against the question, the governing body shall not implement the economic development program, and it shall become null and void. If a majority of those voting on the issue vote against the question, the governing body shall not implement the economic development program.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 22;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB451, § 1.